Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1485.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The title and section 1(a) introductory paragraph and (1), (a.1), (c) and (e) of the act of June 24, 1976 (P.L.424, No.101), referred to as the Emergency and Law Enforcement Personnel Death Benefits Act, are amended to read:SECTION 1. THE TITLE AND SECTION 1(A) INTRODUCTORY PARAGRAPH AND (1), (A.1), (C) AND (D) OF THE ACT OF JUNE 24, 1976 (P.L.424, NO.101), REFERRED TO AS THE EMERGENCY AND LAW ENFORCEMENT PERSONNEL DEATH BENEFITS ACT, ARE AMENDED AND THE SECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBSECTION TO READ:AN ACT<--<--<--1234567891011121314151617181920 Providing for the payment of death benefits to the surviving spouse or children or parents of firefighters, ambulance service or rescue squad members, law enforcement officers, public works employees , CORONERS or National Guard members who die as a result of the performance of their duties.Section 1. (a) In the event a law enforcement officer, ambulance service or rescue squad member, firefighter, certified hazardous material response team member, member of the Pennsylvania Civil Air Patrol, CORONER, public works employee or National Guard member dies as a result of the performance of his duties, an application, including a certification of death, shall be made to the department within three years of the date of such death by any of the following:(1) A political subdivision or an authority created by a political subdivision.* * *(a.1) A firefighter, ambulance service or rescue squad member, law enforcement officer, certified hazardous material response team member, member of the Pennsylvania Civil Air Patrol, CORONER, public works employee or National Guard member who suffers a fatal heart attack or stroke while on duty or not later than 24 hours after participating in a physical training exercise or responding to an emergency is presumed to have died as a result of the performance of his duties for purposes of this act.* * *(c) A volunteer ambulance service, certified hazardous material response team or rescue squad member, public works employee or member of the Pennsylvania Civil Air Patrol shall be deemed to be acting in the performance of his duties for the 20250HB1485PN2881 - 2 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 purposes of this act going to or directly returning from an emergency which the ambulance service, certified hazardous material response team, rescue squad, public works employee or member of the Pennsylvania Civil Air Patrol attended including travel from and direct return to an ambulance service, certified hazardous material response team, rescue squad, public works employee or Pennsylvania Civil Air Patrol member's home, place of business or other place where he or she shall have been when he or she received the call or alarm or while participating in drills in which the ambulance service, certified hazardous material response team, rescue squad, municipality, municipal authority or Pennsylvania Civil Air Patrol shall have participated or while repairing or doing other work about or on any emergency vehicle or buildings and grounds of the ambulance service, certified hazardous material response team, rescue squad, municipality, municipal authority or Pennsylvania Civil Air Patrol upon the authorization of the chief of the ambulance service, certified hazardous material response team, rescue squad, municipality, municipal authority or Pennsylvania Civil Air Patrol or other person in charge while answering any emergency calls for any purpose or while riding upon any vehicles which are owned or used by the ambulance service, certified hazardous material response team, rescue squad or Pennsylvania Civil Air Patrol.(D) UPON RECEIPT OF SUCH CERTIFICATION, THE COMMONWEALTH SHALL, FROM MONEYS PAYABLE OUT OF THE GENERAL FUND, PAY TO THE SURVIVING SPOUSE OR, IF THERE IS NO SURVIVING SPOUSE, TO THE MINOR CHILDREN OF THE PAID FIREFIGHTER, AMBULANCE SERVICE OR RESCUE SQUAD MEMBER [OR], LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER, PUBLIC WORKS EMPLOYEE OR CORONER WHO DIED AS A RESULT OF THE PERFORMANCE OF 20250HB1485PN2881 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 HIS DUTY THE SUM OF $100,000, ADJUSTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION AND AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE MONTHLY SALARY, ADJUSTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION, OF THE DECEASED PAID FIREFIGHTER, AMBULANCE SERVICE OR RESCUE SQUAD MEMBER [OR], LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER, PUBLIC WORKS EMPLOYEE OR CORONER, LESS ANY WORKERS' COMPENSATION OR PENSION OR RETIREMENT BENEFITS PAID TO SUCH SURVIVORS, AND SHALL CONTINUE SUCH MONTHLY PAYMENTS UNTIL THERE IS NO ELIGIBLE BENEFICIARY TO RECEIVE THEM. FOR THE PURPOSE OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE TERM "ELIGIBLE BENEFICIARY" MEANS THE SURVIVING SPOUSE OR THE CHILD OR CHILDREN UNDER THE AGE OF EIGHTEEN YEARS OR, IF ATTENDING COLLEGE, UNDER THE AGE OF TWENTY-THREE YEARS, OF THE FIREFIGHTER, AMBULANCE SERVICE OR RESCUE SQUAD MEMBER [OR], LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER, PUBLIC WORKS EMPLOYEE OR CORONER WHO DIED AS A RESULT OF THE PERFORMANCE OF HIS DUTY. WHEN NO SPOUSE OR MINOR CHILDREN SURVIVE, A SINGLE SUM OF $100,000, ADJUSTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION, SHALL BE PAID TO THE PARENT OR PARENTS OF SUCH FIREFIGHTER, AMBULANCE SERVICE MEMBER, RESCUE SQUAD MEMBER [OR], LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER, PUBLIC WORKS EMPLOYEE OR CORONER.* * *(e) The Commonwealth of Pennsylvania shall pay out of the General Fund to the surviving spouse or, if there is no surviving spouse, the minor children of a National Guard member, certified hazardous material response team member, public works employee, member of the Pennsylvania Civil Air Patrol, volunteer firefighter, ambulance service or rescue squad member who died as a result of the performance of his duties the sum of $100,000, adjusted in accordance with subsection (f) of this section. When no spouse or minor children survive, the benefit 20250HB1485PN2881 - 4 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall be paid to the parent or parents of such National Guard member, certified hazardous material response team member, public works employee, member of the Pennsylvania Civil Air Patrol, volunteer firefighter, ambulance service or rescue squad member. The benefit shall be payable whether or not the National Guard member or certified hazardous material response team member, public works employee, member of the Pennsylvania Civil Air Patrol, volunteer firefighter, ambulance service or rescue squad member died as a result of the performance of his duty within the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.* * *(H) A CORONER SHALL BE DEEMED TO BE ACTING IN THE PERFORMANCE OF HIS DUTIES FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS ACT WHEN ACTING IN ACCORDANCE WITH 16 PA.C.S. CH. 139 (RELATING TO CORONER).Section 2. Section 2 of the act is amended by adding a definition DEFINITIONS to read:Section 2. The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * * "CORONER" MEANS AN ELECTED OR APPOINTED CORONER OR DEPUTY CORONER OR AN ELECTED OR APPOINTED MEDICAL EXAMINER. THE TERM INCLUDES A STAFF PERSON OF AN ELECTED OR APPOINTED CORONER OR A STAFF PERSON OF AN ELECTED OR APPOINTED MEDICAL EXAMINER.* * *"Public works employee" means an employee of a municipality or municipal authority whose employment involves the care, maintenance or construction of municipally owned buildings, open space, parks, parking facilities, waste water treatment systems, 20250HB1485PN2881 - 5 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 water systems, sewers or other property, roads, highways or public infrastructure, and who, as a first responder, or in conjunction with first responders, may respond to emergencies while acting in an official capacity."STAFF PERSON" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL IN THE CORONER'S OFFICE OR MEDICAL EXAMINER'S OFFICE WHO ENGAGES IN ACTIVITIES RELATING TO DEATH INVESTIGATIONS. THE TERM INCLUDES A MEDICAL INVESTIGATOR, FORENSIC TECHNICIAN, LABORATORY DIRECTOR, FORENSIC SUPERVISOR, FORENSIC INVESTIGATOR, SCIENTIST OR AUTOPSY OR HISTOLOGY TECHNICIAN.SECTION 3. SECTION 2.1 OF THE ACT IS AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 2.1. THIS ACT SHALL BE BROADLY CONSTRUED TO GRANT BENEFITS TO FIREFIGHTERS, AMBULANCE SERVICE OR RESCUE SQUAD MEMBERS, LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS, PUBLIC WORKS EMPLOYEES, CORONERS OR NATIONAL GUARD PERSONNEL FOR DEATHS RELATED TO THE PERFORMANCE OF THEIR DUTIES.Section 3 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1485PN2881 - 6 - <--<--1234567891011121314151617